MiKTeX/default/texmflocal/hunspell/dicts/ruen_RUGB.aff
SFX L Y 12
SFX L 0 ament m 
SFX L y iment [^aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ment [aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ment [^my] 
SFX L 0 aments m 
SFX L y iments [^aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ments [aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ments [^my] 
SFX L 0 ament's m 
SFX L y iment's [^aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ment's [aeiou]y 
SFX L 0 ment's [^my] 
SFX Z Y 22
SFX Z e y [^aeiouy]e 
SFX Z 0 y [aeiouy]e 
SFX Z 0 ey [aiouy] 
SFX Z 0 by [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX Z 0 ky [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX Z 0 dy [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX Z 0 fy [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX Z 0 gy [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX Z 0 ky [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX Z 0 ly [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX Z 0 my [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX Z 0 ny [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX Z 0 py [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX Z 0 ry [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX Z 0 sy [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX Z 0 ty [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX Z 0 vy [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX Z 0 zy [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX Z 0 y [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX Z 0 y [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX Z 0 y [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX Z 0 y [^aebcdfgiklmnoprstuvyz] 
SFX 2 Y 21
SFX 2 e iness [^aeiouy]e 
SFX 2 0 iness [aeiouy]e 
SFX 2 0 biness [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX 2 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX 2 0 diness [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX 2 0 finess [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX 2 0 giness [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX 2 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX 2 0 liness [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX 2 0 miness [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX 2 0 niness [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX 2 0 piness [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX 2 0 riness [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX 2 0 siness [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX 2 0 tiness [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX 2 0 viness [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX 2 0 ziness [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX 2 0 iness [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX 2 0 iness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX 2 0 iness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX 2 0 iness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX z Y 24
SFX z e ily [^aeiouy]e 
SFX z 0 ily [aeiouy]e 
SFX z 0 ily [aiou]y 
SFX z ey ily ey 
SFX z y ily [^aeiou]y 
SFX z 0 bily [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX z 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX z 0 dily [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX z 0 fily [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX z 0 gily [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX z 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX z 0 lily [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX z 0 mily [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX z 0 nily [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX z 0 pily [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX z 0 rily [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX z 0 sily [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX z 0 tily [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX z 0 vily [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX z 0 zily [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX z 0 ily [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX z 0 ily [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX z 0 ily [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX z 0 ily [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX y Y 15
SFX y e ory te 
SFX y e atory [mr]e 
SFX y e ary se 
SFX y 0 ry [^mrst]e 
SFX y 0 ory [^aeous]t 
SFX y 0 ry [aeous]t 
SFX y 0 ery h 
SFX y 0 atory [^i]m 
SFX y im matory im 
SFX y 0 ory s 
SFX y 0 ary ion 
SFX y 0 ry [^i]on 
SFX y 0 nery [aiu]n 
SFX y 0 ry [^aiou]n 
SFX y 0 ry [^ehmstn] 
SFX O Y 12
SFX O 0 l a 
SFX O e al [^bcgv]e 
SFX O e ial [bcgv]e 
SFX O 0 ial [bcrx] 
SFX O um al um 
SFX O 0 al [^u]m 
SFX O y al ty 
SFX O y ial [^t]y 
SFX O 0 ual [px]t 
SFX O 0 tal [iu]t 
SFX O 0 al [^ipux]t 
SFX O 0 al [^aebcrtxmy] 
SFX o Y 12
SFZ o 0 lly a 
SFX o e ally [^bcgv]e 
SFX o e ially [bcgv]e 
SFX o 0 ially [bcrx] 
SFX o um ally um 
SFX o 0 ally [^u]m 
SFX o y ally ty 
SFX o y ially [^t]y 
SFX o 0 ually [px]t 
SFX o 0 tally [iu]t 
SFX o 0 ally [^ipux]t 
SFX o 0 ally [^aebcrtxmy] 
SFX W Y 21
SFX W ce tific ce 
SFX W e atic me 
SFX W se tic se 
SFX W le ic ble 
SFX W e ic [^b]le 
SFX W e ic [^clms]e 
SFX W 0 lic [ay]l 
SFX W 0 ic [^ay]l 
SFX W us ic us 
SFX W 0 tic [^u]s 
SFX W er ric er 
SFX W 0 ic [^e]r 
SFX W 0 atic [aeiou]m 
SFX W 0 ic [^aeiou]m 
SFX W 0 tic ma 
SFX W a ic [^m]a 
SFX W y etic thy 
SFX W y ic [^t]hy 
SFX W y tic sy 
SFX W y ic [^hs]y 
SFX W 0 ic [^aelmrsy] 
SFX w Y 9
SFX w e ical e 
SFX w er rical er 
SFX w 0 ical [^e]r 
SFX w 0 atical [aeiou]m 
SFX w 0 ical [^aeiou]m 
SFX w 0 tical ma 
SFX w a ical [^m]a 
SFX w y ical y 
SFX w 0 ical [^aemry] 
SFX 1 Y 9
SFX 1 e ically e 
SFX 1 er rically er 
SFX 1 0 ically [^e]r 
SFX 1 0 atically [aeiou]m 
SFX 1 0 ically [^aeiou]m 
SFX 1 0 tically ma 
SFX 1 a ically [^m]a 
SFX 1 y ically y 
SFX 1 0 ically [^aemry] 
SFX 3 Y 21
SFX 3 e ist [^aceiou]e 
SFX 3 ce tist ce 
SFX 3 0 ist [aeiou]e 
SFX 3 y ist [^aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 0 ist [aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 o ist o 
SFX 3 0 ists [^eoy] 
SFX 3 e ists [^aceiou]e 
SFX 3 ce tists ce 
SFX 3 0 ists [aeiou]e 
SFX 3 y ists [^aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 0 ists [aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 o ists o 
SFX 3 0 ists [^eoy] 
SFX 3 e ist's [^aceiou]e 
SFX 3 ce tist's ce 
SFX 3 0 ist's [aeiou]e 
SFX 3 y ist's [^aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 0 ist's [aeioubp]y 
SFX 3 o ist's o 
SFX 3 0 ist's [^eoy] 
SFX L Y 52
SFX L ть л [^зс]ть
SFX L ть ла [^с]ть
SFX L ть ло [^с]ть
SFX L ть ли [^с]ть
SFX L ться лся [^зс]ться
SFX L ться лась [^с]ться
SFX L ться лось [^с]ться
SFX L ться лись [^с]ться
SFX L сть л [^ч].сть
SFX L есть ел честь
SFX L сть ла [^ч].сть
SFX L есть ла честь
SFX L сть ло [^ч].сть
SFX L есть ло честь
SFX L сть ли [^ч].сть
SFX L есть ли честь
SFX L сться лся сться
SFX L сться лась сться
SFX L сться лось сться
SFX L сться лись сться
SFX L сти л сти
SFX L сти ла сти
SFX L сти ло сти
SFX L сти ли сти
SFX L стись лся стись
SFX L стись лась стись
SFX L стись лось стись
SFX L стись лись стись
SFX L зти з зти
SFX L ти ла зти
SFX L ти ли зти
SFX L ти ло зти
SFX L зть з зть
SFX L ться ся зться
SFX L чь к чь
SFX L чь кла чь
SFX L чь кло чь
SFX L чь кли чь
SFX L чься кся чься
SFX L чься клась чься
SFX L чься клось чься
SFX L чься клись чься
SFX L 0 ла [^аиья]
SFX L 0 ло [^аиья]
SFX L 0 ли [^аиья]
SFX L ся лась [^аиья]ся
SFX L ся лось [^аиья]ся
SFX L ся лись [^аиья]ся
SFX L а о а
SFX L а и а
SFX L ась ось ась
SFX L ась ись ась
SFX M Y 84
SFX M ть ю [ае]ть
SFX M ться юсь [ае]ться
SFX M ть ем [ае]ть
SFX M ться емся [ае]ться
SFX M ть ешь [ае]ть
SFX M ться ешься [ае]ться
SFX M ть ете [ае]ть
SFX M ться етесь [ае]ться
SFX M ть ет [ае]ть
SFX M ться ется [ае]ться
SFX M ть ют [ае]ть
SFX M ться ются [ае]ться
SFX M уть у уть
SFX M ться сь уться
SFX M уть ем уть
SFX M уться емся уться
SFX M уть ешь уть
SFX M уться ешься уться
SFX M уть ете уть
SFX M уться етесь уться
SFX M уть ет уть
SFX M уться ется уться
SFX M ть т уть
SFX M ься ся уться
SFX M оть ю оть
SFX M оться юсь оться
SFX M оть ем оть
SFX M оться емся оться
SFX M оть ешь оть
SFX M оться ешься оться
SFX M оть ете оть
SFX M оться етесь оться
SFX M оть ет оть
SFX M оться ется оться
SFX M оть ют оть
SFX M оться ются оться
SFX M ыть ою ыть
SFX M ыться оюсь ыться
SFX M ыть оем ыть
SFX M ыться оемся ыться
SFX M ыть оешь ыть
SFX M ыться оешься ыться
SFX M ыть оете ыть
SFX M ыться оетесь ыться
SFX M ыть оет ыть
SFX M ыться оется ыться
SFX M ыть оют ыть
SFX M ыться оются ыться
SFX M ти у [зс]ти
SFX M тись усь [зс]тись
SFX M ти ем [зс]ти
SFX M тись емся [зс]тись
SFX M ти ешь [зс]ти
SFX M тись ешься [зс]тись
SFX M ти ете [зс]ти
SFX M тись етесь [зс]тись
SFX M ти ет [зс]ти
SFX M тись ется [зс]тись
SFX M ти ут [зс]ти
SFX M тись утся [зс]тись
SFX M ти ду йти
SFX M тись дусь йтись
SFX M ти дем йти
SFX M тись демся йтись
SFX M ти дешь йти
SFX M тись дешься йтись
SFX M ти дете йти
SFX M тись детесь йтись
SFX M ти дет йти
SFX M тись дется йтись
SFX M ти дут йти
SFX M тись дутся йтись
SFX M чь ку чь
SFX M чься кусь чься
SFX M ь ем чь
SFX M ься емся чься
SFX M ь ешь чь
SFX M ься ешься чься
SFX M ь ете чь
SFX M ься етесь чься
SFX M ь ет чь
SFX M ься ется чься
SFX M чь кут чь
SFX M чься кутся чься
