MiKTeX/default/texmflocal/hunspell/dicts/ruen_RUGB.dic
anthropology/w13SM
astrology/Sw3M1
asymmetry/wMWS1
benefice/DSMoG
bigot/dySM
Bradshaw/M
canoe/MG3DS
chemist/y
chronology/31SMw
climatology/S3w1M
commerce/MGSDo
counter-revolution/MyS
cult/S3M
cushion/MDGS
d/o
debauch/DhiSGy
diameter/WS1wM
dirt/SZM2z
down/MDRSZG
dream/DRpz2SGkZM
electrolyte/1MS
expire/GZDNnyS
feud/oSMDG
filth/SZzM2
flash/MDR2GzZSJ
furtherance/SM
gas/DRM2JSGZ
gerontology/wSM3
haematology/w3WSM
hard/TPYSZz2
herald/MySGWD
heterodox/Z
hypocrite/1MSw
juggle/DRyGS
kraft/M
length/zSZM2
me/3
mes/DzGZ2
mineralogy/3SMw
mod/So
Oates/M
opportunist/MW1S
orthography/1SWMw
outlaw/GDy
petrology/S3wM
physiology/Ww31MS
proverb/oMS
psych/1GDWwS
recession/y
rheostat/MS
rocket/MdyS
room/MZS62
sacrifice/MDoSG
satire/QW3MSw1
scatology/Mw
scratch/RJSDz2ZG
scrub/GZDSR
skimp/SZz2DG
sting/R2GkzSZ
structural/3
sugar/pdSM
taxonomy/31WwSM
terminology/wS1M
toroid/oSM
typography/1SwWM
we/GzJ
zing/MDG
acupuncture/3MS
artist/yW1
atmosphere/DMSW1
azimuth/MoS
bible/MSw1
chat/GMS2ZDz
cheese/MSGZD
chop/DRzZGS2
concession/yo
condition/JSMoDRG
Congregational/3Y
demander/M
empire/MSWw1
entomology/3wSM
environment/o
epistemology/M1w
falcon/ryMS
fish/MzDRS2GZyJ
formalist/W
frisk/G2SZDz
grog/zM2Z
guitar/M3S
histology/wS3M
hoar/2MZ
incident/SMo
lea/MS
majesty/W1SM
mediaeval/3SMY
mud/zZM2S
musket/SMy
octagon/MSo
ophthalmology/3SWM
orator/1SMw
parasite/1MWSw
parquet/dyMS
poke/DRyZGS
racy/TY3P
reed/GMZDS2
relation/oM
rock/2ZRSGMD
sadist/W1
silver/Md2SZ
slop/dGz2ZSD
stead/2zZM
steel/DGSZM2
theosophy/SWw3M
tooth/zpZMD
whims/1wZ
zoology/wS13M
a/o
Abel/M
an/o
archdeacon/MyS
beef/MSZ2GD
bibliography/WMSw1
biotechnology/SMw3
bog/MGSDZ
cat/MzGDZS2
combinator/WMoS
cycle/w3D1MSWG
dartboard/MS
defame/nRGy
dot/MrdZS2kDG
epitaxy/oM
essay/MSDG3R
gastronome/wSZM1
glaciology/3wM
gradual/3PSY
hast/DzZ2
illusion/My3S
inquisitor/MSo
jazz/2MGSDZ
lentil/MS
liturgy/1MS3w
metaphor/wS1WM
microscope/SW1ZMw
momenta/y
monarch/wW3ZM
Monte/Z
must/SZz2
nip/RGZ2SD
philanthropy/1MWS
phrenology/31MwS
projection/S3M
relativist/WM1S
Riviera/M
shake/7S2RGZ
snot/SMz2Z
spectra/Mo
sun/pGM2ZSD
symmetry/1SQwMW
thieve/yDGS
thrift/pz2SMZ
transcendent/oY
tyranny/1QMwS
villain/SZM
womankind/M
annal/3MS
architecture/oMS
bag/6ZRMDz2GS
biology/3Sw1MW
clam/GzMSZD2
contortion/3SM
corpora/nVoM
crank/MDzGTSZ2
creep/Rz2GSZ
cybernetics/M
devil/DLMSyG
dump/RSZ2DG
enthusiast/1SMW
etymology/S3w1M
fox/DMzS2GZ
grit/RS2GMDZ
heave/RZDGS
husband/YSDGMy
increment/oSMNDG
individualist/1W
jerk/DJSZz2G
jury/Sm3G5DM
Lesotho/M
mitigate/NDSGny
orchestra/onSM
pantheist/SW
paunch/2GZMDS
pornography/SW1M
pyrotechny/Ww
residua/yo
revel/RySnGJDN
Rube/M
semeiology/3
stage/ZBS2M
sweat/RzSZGD2M
talk/vSVuDRGZ
vagina/MoS
adulate/SnNDyG
Ahab/M
archaeology/13wSM
autobiography/1MSwW
bawd/2SZMz
boss/2MZSGDz
campanology/S3Mw
coincident/Yo
collie/MRy
corn/SZRGMDz2
crotchet/M2ZS
descendant/MS
egotist/WSM1w
ejaculate/DnSGNy
epigraph/wMSZ
essential/PS3Y
fan/ZDGMS
foam/D2MGSZ
fraction/MoNDGS
fun/Zz2M
grump/M2zSZ
gum/G2ZDMS
heath/RySM
lamentation/M
le/G3z
lexicography/WMw1S
mental/3Y
morphology/w1MS
mug/ZM2GDRJS
multifunction/oD
pharmacology/wS31M
phone/WD1ZMSG
phonology/S3w1M
probation/MRyo
Quito/M
reform/Bny3RNG
savage/PSGDYy
spine/MZp2S
spot/DGRZpMSz2
strategy/3SW1wM
subgenera/W
top/MpRJ1GwDWS
topology/w31SM
trombone/MS3
welterweight/MS
wobble/DS2GY
yeast/Z2MDGS
адыгеец/O
банный/AZ
бархатцы/O
близиться/L
бретонец/O
венгерский/AZ
версты/O
взноситься/BLPW
вкидывать/BLMP
вредить/BLPW
вскрываться/LP
выкрутасы/O
вылущивать/LMP
выправить/BLRTW
вычиститься/BLRW
гигантский/AZ
глупеть/BLMP
голландец/O
грузиться/BLPW
деньги/O
докачивать/BLMP
дурацкий/AZ
ельничек/O
заблудиться/BLRW
завладеть/BLMR
замалчивать/LMP
замедлить/BLRW
застраховываться/BLMP
затрезвонить/LRW
звоночек/O
идеологический/AZ
иззяб/L
искусить/BLRW
истец/O
исшаркать/LMR
кислотный/AZ
клочочек/O
коверкаться/LP
костры/O
кустарничек/O
летный/AZ
лихорадить/LPTW
лужичанин/O
милок/O
молодежный/AZ
морализировать/LQU
назначить/LRTW
намок/L
народоволец/O
нацелиться/LRTW
неподобающий/AZ
оббегать/LMPR
обмылок/O
оболванить/LRW
обрубить/BLRW
озерный/AZ
округлиться/LRW
опечалить/LRTW
оповещать/BLMP
орловец/O
отграничить/LRTW
отерся/L
оттискивать/LMP
охватить/BLRW
парубок/O
пережевываться/L
переменный/AZ
перенасытить/LRW
перетерся/L
пикничок/O
погасить/BLRW
подвешиваться/LMP
поддаваться/BLPU
подстенок/O
подтащиться/LWR
поеживаться/LMP
понадобиться/LRW
попятиться/LRTW
портретец/O
потрясенный/ASZ
похмуриться/LRW
предохранить/BLRW
примириться/BLRW
припадать/LMP
проворонить/LRTW
прогневать/BLMR
продраться/LRY
промтовары/O
просящий/AZ
протиснуться/BLMR
разместиться/BLRW
разъярить/LRW
раскрасавец/O
румынский/AZ
садовничий/O
свивать/BLMP
сириец/O
слукавить/LRW
соборный/AZ
созерцать/BLMP
соседи/O
стесывать/BLMP
судочек/O
тетраэдрический/AZ
ублажить/BLRW
урываться/LMP
фекалии/O
феноменологический/AZ
царить/BLPW
шинок/O
шоколадный/AZ
